Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.525

Security force—Criminal history record information.

An operating agency is authorized to obtain criminal history record information pursuant to RCW 10.97.050 for any member of an operating agency security force and for any applicant seeking employment as a member of an operating agency security force.

[ 1981 c 301 s 2.]